Utah statutes.
4-39-402.   Removal of wild elk -- Liability.

(1)  Upon discovery of wild elk in a domesticated elk facility, the licensee shall immediately notify the Division of Wildlife Resources who shall remove the wild elk.

(2)  The state or a state agency is not liable for disease or genetic purity problems of domesticated elk which may be attributed to wild elk.

